en: Touch Table Computers
xx: Touch Table Computers
cs: Počítače v dotykových tabulích
da: Berøringsfølsomme bordcomputere
de: Multitouch-Tischcomputer
es: Mesas táctiles
fr: Tables tactiles
it: Tavoli touchscreen
ja: タッチテーブルコンピューター
nl: Computers met aanraaktafels
no: Bordformede berørings-PC-er
pl: Komputery touch table
pt: Computadores de mesa sensíveis ao toque
ru: Панельные компьютеры
sv: Pekskärmsdatorer
tr: Dokunmatik Masa Bilgisayarlar

en: Electronics Accessories
xx: Electronics Accessories
cs: Elektronika – příslušenství
da: Elektronik – tilbehør
de: Elektronisches Zubehör
es: Accesorios electrónicos
fr: Accessoires électroniques, Accessoire automobile (et deux-roues) électronique
it: Accessori dispositivi elettronici
ja: 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器
nl: Accessoires voor elektronica
no: Elektronikktilbehør
pl: Akcesoria elektroniczne
pt: Acessórios para eletrônicos
ru: Принадлежности для электроники
sv: Elektroniktillbehör
tr: Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları

en: Smart Cards & RFID Keys
xx: Smart Cards & RFID Keys
fr: Cartes RFID, Carte RFID, Clés RFID, Clé RFID, Cartes à puce (bancaire, de téléphone, d'identité), Carte à puce (bancaire, de téléphone, d'identité)

en: Adapters
xx: Adapters
cs: Adaptéry
da: Adaptere
de: Adapter
es: Adaptadores
fr: Adaptateurs
it: Adattatori
ja: アダプター
nl: Adapters
no: Adaptere
pl: Adaptery
pt: Adaptadores
ru: Адаптеры
sv: Adaptrar
tr: Adaptörler

en: Audio & Video Cable Adapters & Couplers
xx: Audio & Video Cable Adapters & Couplers
cs: Audio a video adaptéry a kabelové spojky
da: Lyd- og videoadaptere
de: Audio/Video-Adapter
es: Adaptadores de audio y vídeo
fr: Adaptateurs et coupleurs de câbles audio et vidéo
it: Adattatori e accoppiatori audio e video
ja: AVアダプター
nl: Audio- en videoadapters
no: Adaptere og koblere til lyd- og videokabler
pl: Adaptery audio i wideo
pt: Adaptadores de áudio e vídeo
ru: Аудио- и видеоадаптеры
sv: Ljud- och grafikadaptrar
tr: Ses ve Video Adaptörleri

en: Memory Card Adapters
xx: Memory Card Adapters
cs: Adaptéry pro paměťové karty
da: Hukommelseskortadaptere
de: Speicheradapter
es: Adaptadores de tarjetas de memoria
fr: Adaptateurs de carte mémoire
it: Adattatori di schede di memoria
ja: メモリーカードアダプター
nl: Geheugenkaartadapters
no: Minnekortadaptere
pl: Adaptery kart pamięci
pt: Adaptadores de cartão de memória
ru: Адаптеры для карт памяти
sv: Minnesadaptrar
tr: Bellek Kartı Adaptörleri

en: USB Adapters
xx: USB Adapters
cs: Karty rozhraní USB
da: USB-adaptere
de: USB-Adapter
es: Adaptadores USB
fr: Adaptateurs USB
it: Adattatori USB
ja: USBアダプター
nl: USB-adapters
no: USB-adaptere
pl: Adaptery USB
pt: Adaptadores USB
ru: USB-адаптеры
sv: USB-adaptrar
tr: USB Adaptörler

en: USB cables
ar: كابلات USB
as: ইউএছবি কেবলসমূহ
az: USB kabelləri
be: USB кабелі
bg: USB кабели
bn: ইউএসবি কেবল
cs: USB kabely
da: USB-kabler
de: USB-Kabel
el: Καλώδια USB
es: Cables USB
et: USB-kaablid
fa: کابل های USB
fi: USB-kaapelit
fr: Câbles USB
ga: Cáblaí USB
gu: યુએસબી કેબલ્સ
hi: यूएसबी केबल
hr: USB kabeli
hu: USB-kábelek
hy: USB մալուխներ
id: Kabel USB
is: USB snúrur
it: Cavi USB
ja: USBケーブル
jw: Kabel USB
ka: USB კაბელები
kk: USB кабельдері
km: ខ្សែ USB
kn: ಯುಎಸ್ಬಿ ಕೇಬಲ್ಗಳು
ko: USB 케이블
ky: USB кабелдери
lt: USB kabeliai
lv: USB kabeļi
mk: УСБ кабли
ml: യുഎസ്ബി കേബിളുകൾ
mn: USB кабелууд
mr: यूएसबी केबल्स
ms: Kabel USB
mt: Kejbils USB
my: ယူအက်စ်ဘီ ကေဘယ်လ်များ
ne: यूएसबी केबलहरू
nl: USB-kabels
no: USB-kabler
or: USB କେବୁଲ୍
pa: USB ਕੇਬਲ
pl: Kable USB
ps: د USB کیبلونه
pt: Cabos USB
ro: Cabluri USB
ru: USB-кабели
sd: يو ايس بي ڪيبل
si: USB කේබල්
sk: USB káble
sl: USB kabli
so: Fiilooyinka USB
sq: Kabllo USB
sr: УСБ каблови
sv: USB-kablar
sw: Kebo za USB
ta: யூஎஸ்பி கேபிள்கள்
te: USB కేబుల్స్
tg: Кабелҳои USB
th: สาย USB
tk: USB kabelleri
tl: Mga USB cable
tr: USB kabloları
uk: USB кабелі
ur: USB کیبلز
uz: USB kabellari
vi: Cáp USB
xh: Iintambo ze-USB
yo: Awọn kebulu USB
zh: USB线
zu: Izintambo ze-USB

en: Antenna Accessories
xx: Antenna Accessories
cs: Antény – příslušenství
da: Antenne – tilbehør
de: Antennenzubehör
es: Accesorios para antenas
fr: Accessoires pour antennes
it: Accessori per antenna
ja: アンテナ関連用品
nl: Antenneaccessoires
no: Antennetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do anten
pt: Acessórios para antenas
ru: Принадлежности для антенн
sv: Antenntillbehör
tr: Anten Aksesuarları

en: Antenna Mounts & Brackets
xx: Antenna Mounts & Brackets
cs: Montážní sady a držáky na antény
da: Antenne – montering og beslag
de: Antennenhalterungen & -befestigungen
es: Escuadras y soportes para antenas
fr: Supports pour antenne
it: Supporti e staffe antenne
ja: アンテナ取付金具
nl: Antennebeugels en -ophangsystemen
no: Antennefester og -braketter
pl: Uchwyty i wsporniki do anten
pt: Suportes para antenas
ru: Опорные механизмы и кронштейны для крепления антенн
sv: Antennmonteringar och fästen
tr: Anten Montaj Kitleri ve Braketleri

en: Antenna Rotators
xx: Antenna Rotators
cs: Anténní rotátory
da: Antenne – roteringsbeslag
de: Dreheinrichtungen
es: Rotadores de antenas
fr: Systèmes de rotation pour antenne
it: Rotatori per antenna
ja: アンテナローテーター
nl: Antennerotoren
no: Antennedreiere
pl: Rotory antenowe
pt: Rotores de antena
ru: Поворотные устройства для антенн
sv: Antennrotorer
tr: Anten Döndürücüler

en: Satellite LNBs
xx: Satellite LNBs
cs: Satelitní konvertory
da: Satellit-LNB'er
de: Satelliten-LNBs
es: LNB para satélite
fr: Blocs-convertisseurs à faible bruit
it: LNB satellitari
ja: 衛星放送用LNB
nl: Satelliet-LNB's
no: Satellitt-LNB-er
pl: Konwertery satelitarne
pt: LNBs
ru: Спутниковые конвертеры
sv: LNB för parabolantenner
tr: Uydu LNB'leri

en: Antennas
xx: Antennas
cs: Antény
da: Antenner
de: Antennen
es: Antenas
fr: Antennes
it: Antenne
ja: アンテナ
nl: Antennes
no: Antenner
pl: Anteny
pt: Antenas
ru: Антенны
sv: Antenner
tr: Antenler

en: Audio & Video Splitters & Switches
xx: Audio & Video Splitters & Switches
cs: AV rozbočovače a přepínače
da: Lyd og video – splitterkabler og omskiftere
de: Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches
es: Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo
fr: Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo
it: Splitter e interruttori audio e video
ja: AVスプリッター・スイッチ
nl: Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars
no: Splittere og svitsjere for lyd og bilde
pl: Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku
pt: Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo
ru: Аудио- и видеоразветвители и переключатели
sv: Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud
tr: Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları

en: DVI Splitters & Switches
xx: DVI Splitters & Switches
cs: Rozbočky a spínače DVI
da: DVI-splittere og -omskiftere
de: DVI-Splitter und -Switches
es: Divisores y conmutadores DVI
fr: Commutateurs et répartiteurs DVI
it: Splitter e interruttori DVI
ja: DVI スプリッター/スイッチ
nl: DVI-splitters en -schakelaars
no: Fordelere og svitsjere for DVI
pl: Rozdzielacze i przełączniki DVI
pt: Divisores e comutadores DVI
ru: DVI-сплиттеры и DVI-коммутаторы
sv: DVI-delare och -omkopplare
tr: DVI Splitterları ve Anahtarları

en: HDMI Splitters & Switches
xx: HDMI Splitters & Switches
cs: Rozbočovače a přepínače HDMI
da: HDMI – splitterkabler og omskiftere
de: HDMI-Splitter & -Switches
es: Divisores y conmutadores HDMI
fr: Switchs et splitters HDMI
it: Splitter e interruttori HDMI
ja: HDMI切替器・スイッチ
nl: HDMI-splitters en -schakelaars
no: Splittere og svitsjere for HDMI
pl: Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do HDMI
pt: Divisores e comutadores HDMI
ru: Разветвители и переключатели HDMI
sv: HDMI-kabeldelare och -omkopplare
tr: HDMI Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları

en: VGA Splitters & Switches
xx: VGA Splitters & Switches
cs: Rozbočky a spínače VGA
da: VGA-splittere og -omskiftere
de: VGA-Splitter und -Switches
es: Divisores y conmutadores VGA
fr: Commutateurs et répartiteurs VGA
it: Splitter e interruttori VGA
ja: VGA スプリッター/スイッチ
nl: VGA-splitters en -schakelaars
no: Fordelere og svitsjere for VGA
pl: Rozdzielacze i przełączniki VGA
pt: Divisores e comutadores VGA
ru: VGA-сплиттеры и VGA-коммутаторы
sv: VGA-delare och -omkopplare
tr: VGA Splitterları ve Anahtarları

en: Blank Media
xx: Blank Media
cs: Prázdná média
da: Tomme medier
de: Leermedien
es: Soportes multimedia vírgenes
fr: Médias vierges, CD DVD et Jeu Video vierges
it: Supporti vergini
ja: 記録用メディア
nl: Lege media
no: Tomme medier
pl: Czyste nośniki
pt: Mídia virgem
ru: Чистые носители
sv: Tomma lagringsmedia
tr: Boş Ortamlar

en: Cable Management
xx: Cable Management
cs: Uspořádání kabelů
da: Kabelstyring
de: Kabel-Management
es: Cableado
fr: Gestion de câbles
it: Gestione dei cavi
ja: ケーブル管理
nl: Kabels wegwerken
no: Kabelorganisering
pl: Zarządzanie kablami
pt: Gerenciamento de cabos
ru: Прокладка кабелей
sv: Kabelhantering
tr: Kablo Yönetimi

en: Cable Clips
xx: Cable Clips
cs: Svorky na kabely
da: Kabelclips
de: Kabelschellen
es: Grapas para cables
fr: Serre-câbles
it: Morsetti per cavi
ja: ケーブルクリップ
nl: Kabelklemmen
no: Kabelklips
pl: Spinacze do kabli
pt: Presilhas para cabos
ru: Зажимы для кабелей
sv: Kabelklämmor
tr: Kablo Klipsleri